Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.030

Submission of certificate—Proof of service of notice.

After the lapse of at least twenty-eight days from the date of the first due publication of the notice of intention to incorporate, and within ten days after the date of the last publication thereof, the incorporation certificate executed in triplicate shall be submitted for examination to the director at his or her office in Olympia, with affidavits showing due publication and service of the notice of intention to organize prescribed in RCW 32.08.020.

[ 1994 c 92 s 309; 1955 c 13 s 32.08.030. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 3; RRS s 3315.]